Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 18 Apples

21-18-1.
“Closed package” defined.

“Closed package” when used in this chapter means a barrel, box, basket, or other container the contents of which cannot be sufficiently inspected without opening it or removing any kind of cover or lid to expose the surface contents to view.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-1

.

21-18-2.
Marking of closed packages.

Each closed package of apples packed or repacked within the state and intended for sale within or without the state shall be marked or branded at the time of packing, repacking, or closing with a statement of the quantity of the contents, the name and address of the person by whose authority the apples were packed, the true name of the variety, and the minimum size or numerical count of the apples contained in it, in accordance with §

21-18-6

. If the true name of the variety is not known to the packer or other person by whose authority the apples are packed, the statement shall include the words “Variety Unknown.” If apples are repacked, the packages shall be marked “Repacked,” and shall bear the name and address of the person by whose authority it is repacked in place of that of the person by whose authority it was originally packed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-2

.

21-18-3.
Marking of minimum size.

Unless the package is marked with the numerical count, the minimum size of all apples, as required by §

21-18-2

, shall be marked upon the package, and shall be determined by taking the transverse diameter of the smallest fruit in the package at right angles to the stem and blossom ends. Minimum sizes shall be stated in variations of one-quarter of an inch (1/4"), such as two inches (2"), two and one-quarter inches (21/4") and so forth, in accordance with the facts. Minimum sizes may be designated by figures instead of words. The word “minimum” may be designated by using the abbreviation “min.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-3

.

21-18-4.
Style of marking.

The branding or marking of barrels, boxes, or baskets under the provisions of this chapter shall be in block letters and figures not less than one-half inch (1/2") in height. The director of environmental management shall prescribe rules and regulations as to the lettering to be used in branding or marking other packages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-4

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-18-5.
Misbranded packages.

For the purposes of this chapter, apples packed in a closed package shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If the package fails to bear all statements required by §

21-18-2

.

If the package bears any statement, design, or device regarding the article or its contents which shall be false or misleading in any particular, or is falsely branded in any particular.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-5

.

21-18-6.
Standard barrel and bushel.

The standard barrel for apples shall be of the following dimensions when measured without distention of its parts: length of stave, twenty-eight and one-half inches (281/2"); diameter of heads, seventeen and one-eighth inches (171/8"); distance between heads, twenty-six inches (26"); circumference of bulge, sixty-four inches (64"), outside measurements; and the thickness of staves not greater than four-tenths of an inch (4/10"); provided that any barrel of a different form having a capacity of seven thousand fifty-six cubic inches (7,056 cu. in.) shall be a standard barrel. The standard bushel box or standard bushel basket for apples shall be a container having a capacity of not less than one United States standard bushel or two thousand one hundred fifty and forty-two one-hundredths cubic inches (2,150.42 cu. in.). Containers for apples other than the standard barrel or bushel shall be marked in terms of cubical capacity or count.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-6

.

21-18-7.
Prosecution of violations.

When the director of environmental management becomes cognizant of the violation of any provision of this chapter, he or she shall cause notice of the violation together with a copy of the findings to be given to the person or persons concerned. Persons notified shall be given a hearing under rules and regulations prescribed by the director. Notices of the hearing shall specify the date, hour, and place of the hearing. Whenever any prosecution takes place, the state director of environmental management shall not be required to furnish surety for costs, upon any complaint made by him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-7

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

21-18-8.
Penalties for violations.

Whoever himself or herself or by servant or agent misbrands apples within the meaning of this chapter, or packs, sells, distributes, or offers or exposes for sale or distribution apples which are misbranded, or apples in closed or open packages so packed that the faced or shown surface gives a false representation of the contents of the package, or packs, sells, distributes, or offers or exposes for sale or distribution, apples in violation of any provision of this chapter, shall be punished for the first offense by a fine not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and for a subsequent offense by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), or be imprisoned for a term of three (3) months, or both the fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1931, ch. 1701, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 212, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-18-8

.